California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) If a street address is not the address at which the licensee receives mail, the licensee shall also notify the board in writing of the mailing address for each location where the licensee is to engage, or intends to engage, in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids, and of any change in the mailing address of their place or places of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 14.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.34.

(a) Every licensee who engages in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids shall have and maintain an established retail business address to engage in that fitting or selling, routinely open for service to customers or clients. The address of the licensee’s place of business shall be registered with the board as provided in Section 2538.33.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if a licensee maintains more than one place of business within this state, they shall apply for and procure a duplicate license for each branch office maintained. The application shall state the name of the person and the location of the place or places of business for which the duplicate license is desired.

(c) A
 hearing aid dispenser may, without obtaining a duplicate license for a branch office, engage on a temporary basis in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids at the primary or branch location of another licensee’s business or at a location or facility that they may use on a temporary basis, provided that the hearing aid dispenser notifies the board in advance in writing of the dates and addresses of those businesses, locations, or facilities at which they will engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 15.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.35.

(a) To the extent not inconsistent with federal law, a licensee shall, before the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid that uses proprietary programming software or locked, nonproprietary programming software, provide the purchaser with a written notice in 12-point type or larger that states
 the following: “The hearing aid being purchased uses proprietary or locked programming software and can only be serviced or programmed at specific facilities or locations.” The written notice shall be signed by the purchaser before the sale. The licensee shall keep and maintain a copy of the notice in accordance with Section 2538.38.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Proprietary programming software” means software used to program hearing aids that is supplied by a hearing aid distributor or manufacturer for the exclusive use by affiliated providers. This software is locked and inaccessible to
 nonaffiliated providers.

(B) “Locked, nonproprietary programming software” means software that any provider can render inaccessible to other hearing aid programmers.

(b) A licensee shall, upon the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid, deliver to the purchaser a written receipt, signed by or on behalf of the licensee, containing all of the following:

(1) The date of consummation of the sale.

(2) Specifications as to the make, serial number, and model number of the hearing aid or aids sold.

(3) The address of the principal place of business of the licensee, and the address and office hours at which the licensee shall be available for fitting or postfitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid or aids sold.

(4) A statement to the effect that the aid or aids delivered to the purchaser are used or reconditioned, as the case may be, if that is the fact.

(5) The number of the licensee’s license and the name and license number of any other hearing aid dispenser, temporary licensee, or trainee licensee, who provided any recommendation or
 consultation regarding the purchase of the hearing aid.

(6) The terms of any guarantee or written warranty, required by Section 1793.02 of the Civil Code, made to the purchaser with respect to the hearing aid or hearing aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.36.

(a) Whenever any of the following conditions are found to exist, either from observations by the licensee or based on information furnished by the prospective hearing aid user, a licensee shall, before fitting or selling a hearing aid to any individual, suggest to that individual in writing that it would be in the individual’s best interest to consult with a licensed physician and surgeon specializing in diseases of the ear, or, if none are available in the community, then to any duly licensed physician and surgeon:

(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear.

(2) History of, or active drainage from the ear within the previous 90 days.

(3) History of sudden or rapidly progressive hearing loss within the previous 90 days.

(4) Acute or chronic dizziness.

(5) Unilateral hearing loss of sudden or recent onset within the previous 90 days.

(6) Significant air-bone gap when generally acceptable standards have been established.

(7) Visible evidence of significant cerumen accumulation or a foreign body in the ear canal.

(8) Pain or discomfort in the ear.

(b) No referral for medical opinion need be made by any licensee in the instance of replacement only of a hearing aid that has been lost or damaged beyond repair within one year of the date of purchase.
 A copy of the written recommendation shall be retained by the licensee for the period provided for in Section 2538.38. A person receiving the written recommendation who elects to purchase a hearing aid shall sign a receipt, and the receipt shall be kept with other documents retained by the licensee for the period provided for in Section 2538.38. Nothing in this section required to be performed by a licensee shall mean that the licensee is engaged in the diagnosis of illness or the practice of medicine or any other activity prohibited by the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 16.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.37.

No hearing aid shall be sold by an individual licensed under this chapter, to a person 16 years of age or younger, unless within the preceding six months a recommendation for a hearing aid has been made by both a board-certified, or a board-eligible physician specializing in otolaryngology, and by a state licensed audiologist. A replacement of an identical hearing aid within one year shall be an exception to this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.38.

A licensee shall, upon the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid, keep and maintain records in the licensee’s office or place of business at all times and each record shall be kept and maintained for a seven-year period. All records related to the sale and fitting of hearing aids shall be open to inspection by the board or its authorized representatives upon reasonable notice. The records kept shall include:

(a) Results of test techniques as they pertain to fitting of the hearing aid.

(b) A copy of the written notice and the written receipt required by Section 2538.35 and the written recommendation and receipt required by Section
 2538.36 when applicable.

(c) Records of maintenance or calibration of equipment used in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 266, Sec. 2.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.39.

A hearing aid dispenser who is the owner, manager, or franchisee at a location where hearing aids are fit or sold, shall be responsible for the adequacy of the fitting or selling of any hearing aid fit and sold by any licensee or licensees at that location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.40.

(a) Upon denial of an application for license, the board shall notify the applicant in writing of the following:

(1) The reason for the denial.

(2) That the applicant has a right to a hearing under Section 2533.2 if they make a written request within 60 days after notice of denial.

(b) Service of the notice required by this section may be made by certified mail addressed to the applicant at the latest address filed by the applicant in writing with the board in their application or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 17.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.41.

Before setting aside the revocation or suspension of any license or modifying the probation of any licensee, the board may require the petitioner to pass the regular examination given for applicants for licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.42.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.43.

It is unlawful to sell or barter, or offer to sell or barter, any license issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.44.

It is unlawful to purchase or procure by barter any license issued by the board with intent to use the same as evidence of the holder’s qualification to practice the fitting or selling of hearing aids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.45.

It is unlawful to alter with fraudulent intent in any material regard a license issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.46.

It is unlawful to use or attempt to use any license issued by the board that has been purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited, or materially altered as a valid license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.47.

It is unlawful to willfully make any false statement in a material regard in an application for an examination before the board for a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.48.

It is unlawful to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids in this state without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unexpired license or temporary license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.49.

It is unlawful for a licensed hearing aid dispenser to fit or sell a hearing aid unless they first do all of the following:

(a) Comply with all provisions of state laws and regulations relating to the fitting or selling of hearing aids.

(b) Conduct a direct observation of the purchaser’s ear canals.

(c) Inform the purchaser of the address and office hours at which the licensee shall be available for fitting or postfitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid or aids sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 18.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.50.

It is unlawful to advertise by displaying a sign or otherwise or hold themselves out to be a person engaged in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked license or temporary license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 19.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.51.

It is unlawful to engage in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids without the licensee having and maintaining an established business address, routinely open for service to their clients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 20.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.52.

When tests are conducted by persons licensed under this article in connection with the fitting and selling of hearing aids, the provisions of this article shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.53.

(a) A license issued under this article expires at midnight on its assigned renewal date.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license, apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.

(c) Temporary license holders shall renew their licenses in accordance with Section 2538.27, and apply for that renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee for temporary licenses.

(d) Each duplicate license issued for a branch office shall expire on the same date as the permanent license of the hearing aid dispenser to whom the duplicate license was issued. These duplicate licenses shall be renewed according to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.54.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed after its expiration the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this article. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 2538.53 which next occurs after the effective date of the
 renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.55.

A license which has been suspended is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the license, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the fitting or selling of hearing aids, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended. A license which has been revoked is subject to expiration, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its
 revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.56.

A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but the holder of the expired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following apply:

(a) They have not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) They pay all of the fees that would be required if they were applying for a license for the first time.

(c) They take and pass the examination that would be required if they were applying for a license for the first time, or otherwise establish to the satisfaction of the board that they are qualified to engage
 in the practice of fitting or selling hearing aids. The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 21.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2538.57.

The amount of fees and penalties prescribed by this article shall be those set forth in this section unless a lower fee is fixed by the board:

(a) The fee for applicants applying for the first time for a license is seventy-five dollars ($75), which shall not be refunded, except to applicants who are found to be ineligible to take an examination for a license. Those applicants are entitled to a refund of fifty dollars ($50).

(b) The fees for taking or retaking the written and practical examinations shall be amounts fixed by the board, which shall be equal to the actual cost of preparing, grading, analyzing, and administering the examinations.

(c) The initial temporary license fee is one hundred dollars ($100). The fee for renewal of a temporary license is one hundred dollars ($100) for each renewal.

(d) The initial permanent license fee is two hundred eighty dollars ($280). The fee for renewal of a permanent license is not more than two hundred eighty dollars ($280) for each renewal.

(e) The initial branch office license fee is twenty-five dollars ($25). The fee for renewal of a branch office license is twenty-five dollars ($25) for each renewal.

(f) The delinquency fee is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(g) The fee for issuance of a replacement license is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(h) The continuing education course approval application fee is fifty dollars ($50).

(i) The fee for official certification of licensure is fifteen dollars ($15).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 9.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Dispensing Audiologists [2539.1. - 2539.14.]

2539.1.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2010, in addition to satisfying the licensure and examination requirements described in Sections 2532, 2532.2, and 2532.25, no licensed audiologist shall sell hearing aids unless they complete an application for a dispensing audiology license, pay all applicable fees, and pass an examination, approved by the board, relating to selling hearing aids.

(2) The board shall issue a dispensing audiology license to a licensed audiologist who meets the requirements of paragraph (1).

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 2010, a licensed audiologist with an unexpired
 license to sell hearing aids pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10) may continue to sell hearing aids pursuant to that license until that license expires pursuant to Section 2538.53, and upon that expiration the licensee shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements described in subdivision (a) and may continue to sell hearing aids pursuant to their audiology license subject to this chapter. Upon the expiration of the audiologist’s license to sell hearing aids, the board shall issue them a dispensing audiology license pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). This paragraph shall not prevent an audiologist who also has a hearing aid dispenser license from maintaining dual or separate licenses if they choose to do so.

(2) A licensed audiologist whose license to sell hearing aids, issued pursuant to Article 8
 (commencing with Section 2538.10), is suspended, surrendered, or revoked shall not be authorized to sell hearing aids pursuant to this subdivision and they shall be subject to the requirements described in subdivision (a) and the other provisions of this chapter.

(c) A licensed hearing aid dispenser who meets the qualifications for licensure as an audiologist shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for the purposes of obtaining a dispensing audiology license.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the board shall provide the hearing aid dispenser examination provided by the former Hearing Aid Dispensers Bureau until the next examination validation and occupational analysis is completed by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant
 to Section 139 and a determination is made that a different examination is to be administered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 13.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.2.

(a) Hearing aids may be sold by catalog or direct mail provided that:

(1) The seller is licensed as an audiologist in this state and is authorized to sell hearing aids pursuant to Section 2539.1.

(2) There is no fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to fitting, selection, or adaptation of the instrument and no advice is given with respect to the taking of an ear impression for an earmold by the seller.

(3) The seller has received a statement which is signed by a physician and surgeon, audiologist, or a hearing aid dispenser, licensed by the State of California which
 verifies that Section 2539.6 has been complied with.

(b) A copy of the statement referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be retained by the seller for the period provided for in Section 2539.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 309, Sec. 12.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.4.

(a) To the extent not inconsistent with federal law, a licensed dispensing audiologist shall, before the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid that uses proprietary programming software or locked, nonproprietary programming software, provide the purchaser with a written notice in 12-point
 type or larger that states the following: “The hearing aid being purchased uses proprietary or locked programming software and can only be serviced or programmed at specific facilities or locations.” The written notice shall be signed by the purchaser before the sale. The licensed dispensing audiologist shall keep and maintain a copy of the notice in accordance with Section 2539.10.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Proprietary
 programming software” means software used to program hearing aids that is supplied by a hearing aid distributor or manufacturer for the exclusive use by affiliated providers. This software is locked and inaccessible to nonaffiliated providers.

(B) “Locked, nonproprietary programming software” means software that any provider can render inaccessible to other hearing aid programmers.

(b) A licensed
 dispensing audiologist shall, upon the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid, deliver to the purchaser a written receipt, signed by or on behalf of the licensed dispensing audiologist, containing all of the following:

(1) The date of consummation of the sale.

(2) Specifications as to the make, serial number, and model number of the hearing aid or aids sold.

(3) The address of the principal place of business of the licensed dispensing audiologist, and the address and office hours at which the
 licensed
 dispensing 
 audiologist shall be available for fitting or postfitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid or aids sold.

(4) A statement to the effect that the aid or aids delivered to the purchaser are used or reconditioned, as the case may be, if that is the fact.

(5) The number of the licensed dispensing audiologist’s license and the name and license number of any other hearing aid dispenser, temporary licensee, or audiologist who provided any recommendation or consultation regarding the purchase of the hearing aid.

(6) The terms of any guarantee or written warranty, required by Section 1793.02 of the Civil
 Code, made to the purchaser with respect to the hearing aid or hearing aids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 266, Sec. 3.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.6.

(a) Whenever any of the following conditions are found to exist either from observations by the licensed audiologist or on the basis of information furnished by the prospective hearing aid user, a licensed audiologist shall, prior to fitting or selling a hearing aid to any individual, suggest to that individual in writing that the individual’s best interests would be served if they consult a licensed physician and surgeon specializing in diseases of the ear or, if none are available in the community, a duly licensed physician and surgeon:

(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear.

(2) History of, or active, drainage from the ear within the previous 90 days.

(3) History of sudden or rapidly progressive hearing loss within the previous 90 days.

(4) Acute or chronic dizziness.

(5) Unilateral hearing loss of sudden or recent onset within the previous 90 days.

(6) Significant air-bone gap (when generally acceptable standards have been established).

(7) Visible evidence of significant cerumen accumulation or a foreign body in the ear canal.

(8) Pain or discomfort in the ear.

(b) No referral for medical opinion need be made by any licensed audiologist in the instance of replacement only of a hearing aid that has been lost or
 damaged beyond repair within one year of the date of purchase. A copy of the written recommendation shall be retained by the licensed audiologist for the period provided for in Section 2539.10. A person receiving the written recommendation who elects to purchase a hearing aid shall sign a receipt for the same, and the receipt shall be kept with the other papers retained by the licensed audiologist for the period provided for in Section 2539.10. Nothing in this section required to be performed by a licensed audiologist shall mean that the licensed audiologist is engaged in the diagnosis of illness or the practice of medicine or any other activity prohibited by the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 23.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.8.

No hearing aid shall be sold by an individual licensed as an audiologist under this chapter to a person 16 years of age or younger, unless within the preceding six months a recommendation for a hearing aid has been made by both a board-certified, or a board-eligible physician specializing in otolaryngology, and by a state licensed audiologist. A replacement of an identical hearing aid within one year shall be an exception to this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 309, Sec. 12.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.10.

A licensed dispensing audiologist shall, upon the consummation of a sale of a hearing aid, keep and maintain records in the licensed dispensing audiologist’s office or place of business at all times and each such record shall be kept and maintained for a seven-year period. These records shall include:

(a) Results of test techniques as they pertain to fitting of the hearing aid.

(b) A copy of the written notice and the written receipt required by
 Section 2539.4 and the written recommendation and receipt required by Section 2539.6, when applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 266, Sec. 4.   (AB 435)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.12.

A licensed audiologist who is the owner, manager, or franchisee at a location where hearing aids are fit or sold, shall be responsible for the adequacy of the fitting or selling of any hearing aid fit and sold by any licensee or licensees at that location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 309, Sec. 12.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2539.14.

The provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2538.11 and the provisions of Section 2538.12 do not apply to a licensed audiologist who satisfies the requirements of Section 2539.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 12.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.4. Prescription Lenses and Ophthalmic and Optometric Assistants [2540. - 2545.]

2540.

No person other than a physician and surgeon or optometrist may measure the powers or range of human vision or determine the accommodative and refractive status of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general or prescribe ophthalmic devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.

A prescription ophthalmic device includes each of the following:

(a) Any spectacle or contact lens ordered by a physician and surgeon or optometrist, that alters or changes the visual powers of the human eye.

(b) Any contact lens described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (n) of Section 520 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360j and following).

(c) Any plano contact lens that is marketed or offered for sale in this state. “Plano contact lens” means a zero-power or noncorrective contact lens intended to change the appearance of the normal eye in a decorative fashion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 148, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.1.

(a) A spectacle lens prescription shall include all of the following:

(1) The dioptric power of the lens. When the prescription needed by the patient has not changed since the previous examination, the prescriber may write on the prescription form “copy lenses currently worn” instead.

(2) The expiration date of the prescription.

(3) The date of the issuance of the prescription.

(4) The name, address, telephone number, prescriber’s license number, and signature of
 the prescribing optometrist or physician and surgeon.

(5) The name of the person to whom the prescription is issued.

(b) The expiration date of a spectacle lens prescription shall not be less than two years and shall not exceed four years from the date of issuance unless the patient’s history or current circumstances establish a reasonable probability of changes in the patient’s vision of sufficient magnitude to necessitate reexamination earlier than two years, or presence or probability of visual abnormalities related to ocular or systemic disease indicates, the need for reexamination of the patient earlier than two years. In no circumstances shall the expiration date be shorter than the period of time recommended by the prescriber for
 reexamination of the patient. Establishing an expiration date that is not consistent with this section shall be regarded as unprofessional conduct by the board that issued the prescriber’s certificate to practice.

(c) The prescriber of a spectacle lens shall orally inform the patient of the expiration date of a spectacle lens prescription at the time the prescription is issued. The expiration date of a prescription may be extended by the prescriber and transmitted by telephone, electronic mail, or any other means of communication. An oral prescription for a spectacle lens shall be reduced to writing and a copy of that writing shall be sent to the prescriber prior to the delivery of the lenses to the person to whom the prescription is issued.

(d) A prescriber of a
 spectacle lens shall abide by the rules pertaining to spectacle lens prescriptions and eye examinations adopted by the Federal Trade Commission found in Part 456 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) An expired prescription may be filled if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The patient’s spectacles are lost, broken, or damaged to a degree that renders them unusable.

(2) Upon dispensing a prescription pursuant to this subdivision, the person dispensing shall recommend that the patient return to the optometrist or physician and surgeon who issued the prescription for an eye examination and provide the prescriber with a written notification of the prescription that was
 filled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 17.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.2.

(a) (1) The expiration date of a contact lens prescription shall not be less than one year and shall not exceed two years from the date of issuance, unless the patient’s history or current circumstances establish a reasonable probability of changes in the patient’s vision of sufficient magnitude to necessitate reexamination earlier than one year, or the presence or probability of visual abnormalities related to ocular or systemic disease indicate the need for reexamination of the patient earlier than one year. If the expiration date of a prescription is less than one year, the health-related reasons for the limitation shall be documented in the patient’s medical record. In no circumstances shall the prescription expiration date
 be less than the period of time recommended by the prescriber for reexamination of the patient.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the date of issuance is the date the patient receives a copy of the prescription.

(3) Establishing an expiration date that is not consistent with this section shall be regarded as unprofessional conduct by the board that issued the prescriber’s license to practice.

(b) Upon completion of the eye examination or, if applicable, the contact lens fitting process for a patient as described in subdivision (e), a prescriber or a registered dispensing optician shall provide the patient with a copy of the patient’s contact lens prescription signed by the prescriber. A prescriber of a contact lens
 shall abide by the rules pertaining to contact lens prescriptions and eye examinations adopted by the Federal Trade Commission pursuant to Part 315 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) If a patient places an order with a contact lens seller other than a physician and surgeon, an optometrist, or a registered dispensing optician, the prescriber or the prescriber’s authorized agent shall, upon request of the contact lens seller and in the absence of the actual prescription, attempt to promptly confirm the information contained in the prescription through direct communication with the contact lens seller.

(d) The contact lens prescription shall include sufficient information for the complete and accurate filling of a prescription, including, but not limited to, the power, the
 material or manufacturer or both, the base curve or appropriate designation, the diameter when appropriate, and an appropriate expiration date. When a provider prescribes a private label contact lens for a patient, the prescription shall include the name of the manufacturer, the trade name of the private label brand, and, if applicable, the trade name of the equivalent national brand.

(e) The contact lens fitting process begins after the initial comprehensive eye examination, and includes an examination to determine the lens specifications, an initial evaluation of the fit of the lens on the patient’s eye, except in the case of a renewal prescription of an established patient, and followup examinations that are medically necessary, and ends when the prescriber or registered dispensing optician determines that an appropriate fit has
 been achieved, or in the case of a prescription renewal for an established patient, the prescriber determines that there is no change in the prescription.

(f) The payment of professional fees for the eye exam, fitting, and evaluation may be required prior to the release of the prescription, but only if the prescriber would have required immediate payment from the patient had the examination revealed that no ophthalmic devices were required. A prescriber or registered dispensing optician shall not charge the patient any fee as a condition to releasing the prescription to the patient. A prescriber may charge an additional fee for verifying ophthalmic devices dispensed by another seller if the additional fee is imposed at the time the verification is performed.

(g) A prescriber shall
 not condition the availability of an eye examination, a contact lens fitting, or the release of a contact lens prescription on a requirement that the patient agree to purchase contact lenses from that prescriber. A registered dispensing optician shall not condition the availability of a contact lens fitting on a requirement that the patient agrees to purchase contact lenses from that registered dispensing optician.

(h) A prescriber or a registered dispensing optician shall not place on the contact lens prescription, deliver to the patient, or require a patient to sign a form or notice waiving or disclaiming the liability or responsibility of the prescriber or registered dispensing optician for the accuracy of the ophthalmic devices dispensed by another seller. This prohibition against waivers and disclaimers shall not impose liability on a
 prescriber or registered
 dispensing optician for the ophthalmic devices dispensed by another seller pursuant to the prescriber’s prescription.

(i) The willful failure or refusal of a prescriber to comply with the provisions of this section shall constitute grounds for professional discipline, including, but not limited to, the imposition of a fine or the suspension or revocation of the prescriber’s license. The Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the California State Board of Optometry shall adopt regulations, to implement this subdivision, including, but not limited to, standards for processing complaints each receives regarding this subdivision.

(j) For the purposes of this section, “prescriber” means a physician and surgeon or an optometrist.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of a registered dispensing optician as defined in Sections 2542, 2543, and Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2541.3.

(a) The State Department of Public Health, the California State Board of Optometry, and the Medical Board of California shall prepare and adopt quality standards and adopt regulations relating to prescription ophthalmic devices, including, but not limited to, lenses, frames, and contact lenses. In promulgating these rules and regulations, the department and the boards shall adopt the current standards of the American National Standards Institute regarding ophthalmic materials. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department and the boards from jointly adopting subsequent standards that are equivalent or more stringent than the current standards of the American National Standards Institute regarding ophthalmic materials.
